District of Columbia statutes.
28-4903

Prospective application.

This chapter applies to any electronic record or electronic signature created, generated, sent, communicated, received, or stored on or after [October 3, 2001].

Oct. 3, 2001, D.C. Law 14-28, § 3502(b), 48 DCR 6981
Mar. 13, 2004, D.C. Law 15-105, § 64, 51 DCR 881

History

D.C. Law 15-105 validated previously made technical corrections.

Effect of Amendments

For temporary (90 day) addition of section, see § 3202(b) of Fiscal Year 2002 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-124, August 3, 2001, 48 DCR 7861).

Emergency Legislation

Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 4 of the Uniform Electronic Transactions Act (1999 Act).

Editor's Notes